native-src/hyphen-2.8.3/hyph_en_US.dic
.po8l8y8g9o8n9i9z8a9t8i8o8n.
.po9l8y8p8h9o9n8o8u8s.
.po8l8y9s8t8y8r8e8n8e.
.po8m8e9g8r8a8n9a8t8e.
.po8r8o9e8l8a8s9t8i8c.
.po8r9o8u8s.
.po8r9t8a9b8l8e.
.po8s8t9a8m9b8l8e.
.po8s8t9a8m9b8l8e8s.
.po8s8t9h8u9m8o8u8s.
.po8s8t9s8c8r8i8p8t.
.po8s8t9s8c8r8i8p8t8s.
.po8s9t8u8r9a8l.
.pr8e9a8m9b8l8e.
.pr8e9a8m9b8l8e8s.
.pr8e9l8o8a8d8e8d.
.pr8e9p8a8r9i8n8g.
.pr8e9p8r8i8n8t.
.pr8e9p8r8i8n8t8s.
.pr8e9p8r8o8c8e8s9s8o8r.
.pr8e9p8r8o8c8e8s9s8o8r8s.
.pr8e9s8p8l8i8t9t8i8n8g.
.pr8e9w8r8a8p.
.pr8e9w8r8a8p8p8e8d.
.pr8i8e8s8t9e8s8s8e8s.
.pr8e8t9t8y9p8r8i8n9t8e8r.
.pr8e8t9t8y9p8r8i8n9t8i8n8g.
.pr8o9c8e9d8u8r9a8l.
.pr8o8c8e8s8s.
.pr8o9c8u8r9a8n8c8e.
.pr8o8g9e9n8i8e8s.
.pr8o8g9e9n8y.
.pr8o9g8r8a8m9m8a8b8l8e.
.pr8o8m9i9n8e8n8t.
.pr8o9m8i8s9c8u9o8u8s.
.pr8o8m9i8s9s8o8r8y.
.pr8o8m9i8s8e.
.pr8o8m9i8s8e8s.
.pr8o9p8e8l9l8e8r.
.pr8o9p8e8l9l8e8r8s.
.pr8o9p8e8l9l8i8n8g.
.pr8o9h8i8b9i9t8i8v8e.
.pr8o9h8i8b9i9t8i8v8e9l8y.
.pr8o9s8c8i8u8t9t8o.
.pr8o9t8e8s8t9e8r.
.pr8o9t8e8s8t9e8r8s.
.pr8o9t8e8s9t8o8r.
.pr8o9t8e8s9t8o8r8s.
.pr8o9t8o9l8a8n9g8u8a8g8e.
.pr8o9t8o9t8y8p9a8l.
.pr8o8v9i8n8c8e.
.pr8o8v9i8n8c8e8s.
.pr8o9v8i8n9c8i8a8l.
.pr8o8w9e8s8s.
.ps8e8u9d8o9d8i8f9f8e8r9e8n9t8i8a8l.
.ps8e8u9d8o9f8i9n8i8t8e.
.ps8e8u9d8o9f8i9n8i8t8e9l8y.
.ps8e8u9d8o9f8o8r8c8e8s.
.ps8e8u9d8o8g9r8a9p8h8e8r.
.ps8e8u9d8o9g8r8o8u8p.
.ps8e8u9d8o9g8r8o8u8p8s.
.ps8e8u9d8o9n8y8m.
.ps8e8u9d8o9n8y8m8s.
.ps8e8u9d8o9w8o8r8d.
.ps8e8u9d8o9w8o8r8d8s.
.ps8y9c8h8e9d8e8l9i8c.
.ps8y8c8h8s.
.pu9b8e8s9c8e8n8c8e.
.qu8a8d9d8i8n8g.
.qu8a9d8r8a8t9i8c.
.qu8a9d8r8a8t9i8c8s.
.qu8a8d9r8a9t8u8r8e.
.qu8a8d9r8i9p8l8e8g9i8c.
.qu8a8i8n8t9e8r.
.qu8a8i8n8t9e8s8t.
.qu8a9s8i9e8q8u8i8v9a9l8e8n8c8e.
.qu8a9s8i9e8q8u8i8v9a9l8e8n8c8e8s.
.qu8a9s8i9e8q8u8i8v9a9l8e8n8t.
.qu8a9s8i9h8y9p8o9n8o8r9m8a8l.
.qu8a9s8i9r8a8d9i9c8a8l.
.qu8a9s8i9r8e8s8i8d9u8a8l.
.qu8a9s8i9s8m8o8o8t8h.
.qu8a9s8i9s8t8a9t8i8o8n9a8r8y.
.qu8a9s8i9t8o8p8o8s.
.qu8a9s8i9t8r8i9a8n9g8u9l8a8r.
.qu8a9s8i9t8r8i8v9i8a8l.
.qu8i8n9t8e8s9s8e8n8c8e.
.qu8i8n9t8e8s9s8e8n8c8e8s.
.qu8i8n9t8e8s9s8e8n9t8i8a8l.
.ra8b9b8i8t9r8y.
.ra9d8i9o8g9r8a9p8h8y.
.ra8f8f9i8s8h.
.ra8f8f9i8s8h9l8y.
.ra8m9s8h8a8c8k8l8e.
.ra8v9e8n9o8u8s.
.re9a8r8r8a8n8g8e9m8e8n8t.
.re9a8r8r8a8n8g8e9m8e8n8t8s.
.re8c9i9p8r8o8c9i9t8i8e8s.
.re8c9i9p8r8o8c9i9t8y.
.re8c9t8a8n9g8l8e.
.re8c9t8a8n9g8l8e8s.
.re8c9t8a8n9g8u9l8a8r.
.re9d8i9r8e8c8t.
.re9d8i9r8e8c8t9i8o8n.
.re9d8u8c9i8b8l8e.
.re9e8c8h8o.
.re9p8h8r8a8s8e.
.re9p8h8r8a8s8e8s.
.re9p8h8r8a8s8e8d.
.re9p8o9s8i9t8i8o8n.
.re9p8o9s8i9t8i8o8n8s.
.re9p8r8i8n8t.
.re9p8r8i8n8t8s.
.re9s8t8o8r9a8b8l8e.
.re8t8r8o9f8i8t.
.re8t8r8o9f8i8t9t8e8d.
.re9u8s9a8b8l8e.
.re9u8s8e.
.re9w8i8r8e.
.re9w8r8a8p.
.re9w8r8a8p8p8e8d.
.re9w8r8i8t8e.
.rh8i9n8o8c9e8r9o8s.
.ri8g8h8t9e8o8u8s.
.ri8g8h8t9e8o8u8s9n8e8s8s.
.ri8n8g9l8e8a8d8e8r.
.ri8n8g9l8e8a8d8e8r8s.
.ro9b8o8t.
.ro9b8o8t8s.
.ro9b8o8t8i8c.
.ro9b8o8t9i8c8s.
.ro8u8n8d9t8a8b8l8e.
.ro8u8n8d9t8a8b8l8e8s.
.sa8l8e8s9c8l8e8r8k.
.sa8l8e8s9c8l8e8r8k8s.
.sa8l8e8s9w8o8m8a8n.
.sa8l8e8s9w8o8m8e8n.
.sa8l9m8o9n8e8l9l8a.
.sa8l9t8a9t8i8o8n.
.sa8r9s8a9p8a8r9i8l9l8a.
.sa8u8e8r9k8r8a8u8t.
.sc8a8t9o9l8o8g9i9c8a8l.
.sc8h8e8d9u8l9i8n8g.
.sc8h8i8z9o9p8h8r8e8n8i8c.
.sc8h8n8a8u9z8e8r.
.sc8h8o8o8l9c8h8i8l8d.
.sc8h8o8o8l9c8h8i8l8d9r8e8n.
.sc8h8o8o8l9t8e8a8c8h8e8r.
.sc8h8o8o8l9t8e8a8c8h9e8r8s.
.sc8r8u9t8i9n8y.
.sc8y8t8h9i8n8g.
.se8l8l9e8r.
.se8l8l9e8r8s.
.se8c9r8e9t8a8r9i8a8t.
.se8c9r8e9t8a8r9i8a8t8s.
.se8m9a9p8h8o8r8e.
.se8m9a9p8h8o8r8e8s.
.se9m8e8s9t8e8r.
.se8m8i9d8e8f9i9n8i8t8e.
.se8m8i9d8i9r8e8c8t.
.se8m8i9h8o9m8o9t8h8e8t9i8c.
.se8m8i9r8i8n8g.
.se8m8i9r8i8n8g8s.
.se8m8i9s8i8m9p8l8e.
.se8m8i9s8k8i8l8l8e8d.
.se8r8o9e8p8i9d8e9m8i9o9l8o8g9i9c8a8l.
.se8r9v8o9m8e8c8h9a8n8i8s8m.
.se8r9v8o9m8e8c8h9a8n8i8s8m8s.
.se8s9q8u8i9p8e9d8a9l8i8a8n.
.se8t9u8p.
.se8t9u8p8s.
.se9v8e8r8e9l8y.
.sh8a8p8e9a8b8l8e.
.sh8o8e9s8t8r8i8n8g.
.sh8o8e9s8t8r8i8n8g8s.
.si8d8e9s8t8e8p.
.si8d8e9s8t8e8p8s.
.si8d8e9s8w8i8p8e.
.sk8y9s8c8r8a8p8e8r.
.sk8y9s8c8r8a8p8e8r8s.
.sm8o8k8e9s8t8a8c8k.
.sm8o8k8e9s8t8a8c8k8s.
.sn8o8r9k8e8l9i8n8g.
.so9l8e9n8o8i8d.
.so9l8e9n8o8i8d8s.
.so8l8u8t8e.
.so8l8u8t8e8s.
.so8v9e8r9e8i8g8n.
.so8v9e8r9e8i8g8n8s.
.sp8a9c8e8s.
.sp8e9c8i8o8u8s.
.sp8e8l8l9e8r.
.sp8e8l8l9e8r8s.
.sp8e8l8l9i8n8g.
.sp8e9l8u8n8k9e8r.
.sp8e8n8d9t8h8r8i8f8t.
.sp8h8e8r9o8i8d.
.sp8h8e8r9o8i8d9a8l.
.sp8h8i8n9g8e8s.
.sp8i8c9i9l8y.
.sp8i8n9o8r8s.
.sp8o8k8e8s9w8o8m8a8n.
.sp8o8k8e8s9w8o8m8e8n.
.sp8o8r8t8s9c8a8s8t.
.sp8o8r8t8s9c8a8s8t9e8r.
.sp8o8r9t8i8v8e9l8y.
.sp8o8r8t8s9w8e8a8r.
.sp8o8r8t8s9w8r8i8t8e8r.
.sp8o8r8t8s9w8r8i8t8e8r8s.
.sp8r8i8g8h8t9l8i8e8r.
.sq8u8e8a9m8i8s8h.
.st8a8n8d9a8l8o8n8e.
.st8a8r9t8l8i8n8g.
.st8a8r9t8l8i8n8g9l8y.
.st8a9t8i8s9t8i8c8s.
.st8e8a8l8t8h9i8l8y.
.st8e8e8p8l8e9c8h8a8s8e.
.st8e8r8e8o9g8r8a8p8h9i8c.
.st8o9c8h8a8s9t8i8c.
.st8r8a8n8g8e9n8e8s8s.
.st8r8a8p9h8a8n8g8e8r.
.st8r8a8t9a9g8e8m.
.st8r8a8t9a9g8e8m8s.
.st8r8e8t8c8h9i9e8r.
.st8r8i8p9t8e8a8s8e.
.st8r8o8n8g9h8o8l8d.
.st8r8o8n8g9e8s8t.
.st8u9p8i8d9e8r.
.st8u9p8i8d9e8s8t.
.su8b9d8i8f9f8e8r9e8n9t8i8a8l.
.su8b9e8x9p8r8e8s9s8i8o8n.
.su8b9e8x9p8r8e8s9s8i8o8n8s.
.su8m9m8a9b8l8e.
.su8p8e8r9e8g8o.
.su8p8e8r9e8g8o8s.
.su9p8r8e8m9a9c8i8s8t.
.su9p8r8e8m9a9c8i8s8t8s.
.su8r9v8e8i8l9l8a8n8c8e.
.sw8i8m9m8i8n8g9l8y.
.sy8m8p9t8o9m8a8t8i8c.
.sy8n9c8h8r8o9m8e8s8h.
.sy8n9c8h8r8o9n8o8u8s.
.sy8n9c8h8r8o9t8r8o8n.
.ta8f8f9r8a8i8l.
.ta8l8k9a9t8i8v8e.
.ta9p8e8s9t8r8y.
.ta9p8e8s9t8r8i8e8s.
.ta8r9p8a8u9l8i8n.
.ta8r9p8a8u9l8i8n8s.
.te9l8e8g9r8a9p8h8e8r.
.te9l8e8g9r8a9p8h8e8r8s.
.te8l8e9k8i9n8e8t9i8c.
.te8l8e9k8i9n8e8t9i8c8s.
.te8l8e9r8o9b8o8t9i8c8s.
.te8l8l9e8r.
.te8l8l9e8r8s.
.te8m9p8o9r8a8r9i8l8y.
.te8n9u8r8e.
.te8s8t9b8e8d.
.te8x8t9w8i8d8t8h.
.th8a8l9a9m8u8s.
.th8e8r9m8o9e8l8a8s9t8i8c.
.ti8m8e9s8t8a8m8p.
.ti8m8e9s8t8a8m8p8s.
.to8o8l9k8i8t.
.to8o8l9k8i8t8s.
.to8p8o9g8r8a8p8h9i9c8a8l.
.to8q8u8e8s.
.tr8a8i9t8o8r9o8u8s.
.tr8a8n8s9c8e8i8v8e8r.
.tr8a8n8s9c8e8i8v8e8r8s.
.tr8a8n8s9g8r8e8s8s.
.tr8a8n8s9v8e8r9s8a8l.
.tr8a8n8s9v8e8r9s8a8l8s.
.tr8a8n8s9v8e8s9t8i8t8e.
.tr8a8n8s9v8e8s9t8i8t8e8s.
.tr8a9v8e8r8s9a9b8l8e.
.tr8a9v8e8r9s8a8l.
.tr8a9v8e8r9s8a8l8s.
.tr8i9e8t8h8y8l9a8m8i8n8e.
.tr8e8a8c8h9e8r8i8e8s.
.tr8o8u9b8a9d8o8u8r.
.tu8r9k8e8y.
.tu8r9k8e8y8s.
.tu8r8n9a8r8o8u8n8d.
.tu8r8n9a8r8o8u8n8d8s.
.ty8p9a8l.
.un9a8t9t8a8c8h8e8d.
.un9e8r8r9i8n8g9l8y.
.un9f8r8i8e8n8d9l8y.
.un9f8r8i8e8n8d9l8i9e8r.
.va8g8u8e8r.
.va8u8d8e9v8i8l8l8e.
.vi8c9a8r8s.
.vi8l9l8a8i8n9e8s8s.
.vi8s9u8a8l.
.vi8s9u8a8l9l8y.
.vi9v8i8p9a9r8o8u8s.
.vo8i8c8e9p8r8i8n8t.
.vs8p8a8c8e.
.wa8d9d8i8n8g.
.wa8l8l9f8l8o8w8e8r.
.wa8l8l9f8l8o8w9e8r8s.
.wa8r8m9e8s8t.
.wa8s8t8e9w8a8t8e8r.
.wa8v8e9g8u8i8d8e.
.wa8v8e9g8u8i8d8e8s.
.wa8v8e9l8e8t.
.wa8v8e9l8e8t8s.
.we8b9l8i8k8e.
.we8e8k9n8i8g8h8t.
.we8e8k9n8i8g8h8t8s.
.wh8e8e8l9c8h8a8i8r.
.wh8e8e8l9c8h8a8i8r8s.
.wh8i8c8h9e8v8e8r.
.wh8i8t8e9s8i8d8e8d.
.wh8i8t8e9s8p8a8c8e.
.wh8i8t8e9s8p8a8c8e8s.
.wi8d8e9s8p8r8e8a8d.
.wi8n8g9s8p8a8n.
.wi8n8g9s8p8a8n8s.
.wi8n8g9s8p8r8e8a8d.
.wi8t8c8h9c8r8a8f8t.
.wo8r8d9s8p8a8c9i8n8g.
.wo8r8k9a8r8o8u8n8d.
.wo8r8k9a8r8o8u8n8d8s.
.wo8r8k9h8o8r8s8e.
.wo8r8k9h8o8r8s8e8s.
.wr8a8p9a8r8o8u8n8d.
.wr8e8t8c8h9e8d.
.wr8e8t8c8h9e8d9l8y.
.ye8s9t8e8r9y8e8a8r.
.al9g8e9b8r8a8i9s8c8h8e.
.al9l8e9g8h8e9n8y.
.ar9k8a8n9s8a8s.
.at8p9a8s8e.
.at8p9a8s8e8s.
.au8s9t8r8a8l9a8s8i8a8n.
.au8t8o9m8a8t8i9s8i8e8r9t8e8r.
.be9d8i8e9n8u8n8g.
.be8m8b8o.
.bi8b9l8i9o9g8r8a9p8h8i9s8c8h8e.
.bo8s9t8o8n.
.br8o8w8n9i8a8n.
.br8u8n8s9w8i8c8k.
.bu9d8a9p8e8s8t.
.ca8r9i8b9b8e8a8n.
.ch8a8r8l8e8s9t8o8n.
.ch8a8r9l8o8t8t8e8s9v8i8l8l8e.
.co9l8u8m9b8i8a.
.cz8e8c8h8o9s8l8o9v8a9k8i8a.
.de8l9a9w8a8r8e.
.di8j8k9s8t8r8a.
.du8a8n8e.
.dy9n8a9m8i9s8c8h8e.
.en8g9l8i8s8h.
.eu8l8e8r9i8a8n.
.ev8a8n9s8t8o8n.
.fe8b9r8u9a8r8y.
.fe8s8t9s8c8h8r8i8f8t.
.fl8o8r9i9d8a.
.fl8o8r9i9d9i8a8n.
.fo8r9s8c8h8u8n8g8s9i8n9s8t8i9t8u8t.
.fr8e8e9b8s8d.
.fu8n8k9t8s8i8o8n8a8l.
.ga8u8s8s9i8a8n.
.gh8o8s8t9s8c8r8i8p8t.
.gh8o8s8t9v8i8e8w.
.gr8a8s8s9m8a8n8n9i8a8n.
.gr8e8i8f8s9w8a8l8d.
.gr8o8t8h8e8n9d8i8e8c8k.
.gr8u8n8d9l8e8h9r8e8n.
.ha9d8a9m8a8r8d.
.ha8i9f8a.
.ha8m8i8l9t8o8n9i8a8n.
.he8l9s8i8n8k8i.
.he8r9m8i8t9i8a8n.
.hi8b8b8s.
.ho8k9k8a8i9d8o.
.ja8c9k8o8w9s8k8i.
.ja8n9u9a8r8y.
.ja9p8a9n8e8s8e.
.ka8d9o8m9t8s8e8v.
.ka8n9s8a8s.
.ka8r8l8s9r8u8h8e.
.ko8r9t8e9w8e8g.
.kr8i8s8h8n8a.
.kr8i8s8h9n8a9i8s8m.
.kr8i8s8h9n8a8n.
.la8n9c8a8s9t8e8r.
.le9g8e8n8d8r8e.
.le8i8c8e8s9t8e8r.
.li8p9s8c8h8i8t8z.
.li8p9s8c8h8i8t8z9i8a8n.
.lo8j9b8a8n.
.lo8u9i9s8i9a8n8a.
.ma8c9o8s.
.ma8n9c8h8e8s9t8e8r.
.ma8r9k8o8v9i8a8n.
.ma8r8k8t9o8b8e8r9d8o8r8f.
.ma8s8s9a9c8h8u9s8e8t8t8s.
.ma8x9w8e8l8l.
.mi9c8r8o9s8o8f8t.
.mi8n9n8e9a8p9o9l8i8s.
.mi8n9n8e9s8o8t8a.
.mo8s9c8o8w.
.na8c8h9r8i8c8h8t8e8n.
.na8s8h9v8i8l8l8e.
.ne8t9b8s8d.
.ne8t9s8c8a8p8e.
.ni8j9m8e9g8e8n.
.no8e9t8h8e8r9i8a8n.
.no8o8r8d9w8i8j8k8e8r9h8o8u8t.
.no9v8e8m9b8e8r.
.op8e8n9b8s8d.
.op8e8n9o8f8f8i8c8e.
.pa8l8a9t8i8n8o.
.pa9l8e8r9m8o.
.pe9t8r8o8v9s8k8i.
.pf8a8f8f9i8a8n.
.ph8i8l9a9d8e8l9p8h8i8a.
.ph8i8l9o9s8o8p8h9i9s8c8h8e.
.po8i8n9c8a8r8e.
.po9t8e8n9t8i8a8l9g8l8e8i9c8h8u8n8g.
.ra9d8h8a9k8r8i8s8h9n8a8n.
.ra8t8h8s9k8e8l9l8e8r.
.ri8e9m8a8n8n9i8a8n.
.ry8d9b8e8r8g.
.sc8h8o8t9t8i8s8c8h8e.
.sc8h8r8o9d8i8n8g9e8r.
.sc8h8w8a9b8a9c8h8e8r.
.sc8h8w8a8r8z9s8c8h8i8l8d.
.se8p9t8e8m9b8e8r.
.st8o8k8e8s9s8c8h8e.
.st8u8t8t9g8a8r8t.
.su8s9q8u8e9h8a8n9n8a.
.ta8u9b8e8r9i8a8n.
.te8c8h9n8i9s8c8h8e.
.te8n9n8e8s9s8e8e.
.to9m8a9s8z8e8w9s8k8i.
.ty9p8o9g8r8a8p8h8i8q8u8e.
.uk8r8a8i8n9i8a8n.
.ve8r9a8l8l9g8e9m8e8i8n9e8r8t8e.
.ve8r9e8i8n9i9g8u8n8g.
.ve8r9t8e8i9l8u8n9g8e8n.
.vi8i8i8t8h.
.vi8i8t8h.
.wa8h8r9s8c8h8e8i8n9l8i8c8h9k8e8i8t8s9t8h8e8o9r8i8e.
.we8r9n8e8r.
.we8r9t8h8e8r9i8a8n.
.wi8n9c8h8e8s9t8e8r.
.wi8r8t9s8c8h8a8f8t.
.wi8s9s8e8n9s8c8h8a8f8t9l8i8c8h.
.xv8i8i8i8t8h.
.xv8i8i8t8h.
.xx8i8i8i8r8d.
.xx8i8i8n8d.
.yi8n8g9y8o8n8g.
.sh8u9x8u8e.
.ji9s8u8a8n.
.ze8a9l8a8n8d.
.ze8i8t9s8c8h8r8i8f8t.
